ro-RO: Material pentru placa de rezonanță a pianului acustic: Cedru; Molid Engelmann; Molid european; Molid laminat; Molid Sitka; Molid masiv; Molid; Altele
el: Υλικό ηχείου ακουστικού πιάνου: Κέδρος; Έλατο Engelmann; Ευρωπαϊκό έλατο; Laminated έλατο; Έλατο Sitka; Μασίφ έλατο; Έλατο; Άλλο
pl: Materiał płyty rezonansowej fortepianu akustycznego: Cedr; Świerk Engelmanna; Świerk europejski; Świerk laminowany; Świerk sitkajski; Świerk lity; Świerk; Inne
sl-SI: Material resonančne plošče akustičnega klavirja: Cedra; Engelmannova smreka; Evropska smreka; Laminirana smreka; Sitkanska smreka; Masivna smreka; Smreka; Drugo
da: Materiale til klangbund af akustisk klaver: Cedertræ; Engelmann-gran; Europæisk gran; Lamineret gran; Sitkagran; Massiv gran; Gran; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal rezonantne daske akustičnog klavira: Cedar; Engelmannova smreka; Europska smreka; Laminirana smreka; Sitka smreka; Puna smreka; Smreka; Ostalo
nb: Materiale for lydplate til akustisk piano: Seder; Engelmannsgran; Europeisk gran; Laminert gran; Sitkagran; Massiv gran; Gran; Annet
it: Materiale per la tavola armonica di un pianoforte acustico: Cedro; Abete di Engelmann; Abete europeo; Abete laminato; Abete Sitka; Abete massello; Abete; Altro
pt-BR: Material da tábua harmônica de um piano acústico: Cedro; Abeto Engelmann; Abeto europeu; Abeto laminado; Abeto Sitka; Abeto maciço; Abeto; Outros
vi: Vật liệu mặt cộng hưởng đàn piano acoustic: Gỗ tuyết tùng; Gỗ vân sam Engelmann; Gỗ vân sam châu Âu; Gỗ vân sam ép; Gỗ vân sam Sitka; Gỗ vân sam nguyên khối; Gỗ vân sam; Khác
th: วัสดุซาวด์บอร์ดของเปียโนอะคูสติก: ซีดาร์; อิงเกิลแมนน์สปรูซ; ยูโรเปียนสปรูซ; ไม้สนลามิเนต (ลามิเนตสปรูซ); ซิตกาสปรูซ; ไม้สนแท้ (โซลิดสปรูซ); ไม้สนสปรูซ; อื่นๆ
en: Acoustic piano soundboard material: Cedar; Engelmann spruce; European spruce; Laminated spruce; Sitka spruce; Solid spruce; Spruce; Other
de: Material für den Resonanzboden eines akustischen Klaviers: Zeder; Engelmann-Fichte; Europäische Fichte; Laminierte Fichte; Sitka-Fichte; Massive Fichte; Fichte; Andere
hu: Akusztikus zongora rezonánslapjának anyaga: Cédrus; Engelmann lucfenyő; Európai lucfenyő; Laminált lucfenyő; Sitka lucfenyő; Tömör lucfenyő; Lucfenyő; Egyéb
zh-TW: 原聲鋼琴響板材質: 雪松; 英格曼雲杉; 歐洲雲杉; 層壓雲杉; 西特卡雲杉; 單板雲杉; 雲杉; 其他
tr: Akustik piyano ses tahtası malzemesi: Sedir; Engelmann ladini; Avrupa ladini; Lamine ladin; Sitka ladini; Masif ladin; Ladin; Diğer
fr: Matériau de la table d’harmonie du piano acoustique: Cèdre; Épicéa d’Engelmann; Épicéa d’Europe; Épicéa laminé; Épicéa de Sitka; Épicéa massif; Épicéa; Autre
fi: Akustisen pianon kaikupohjan materiaali: Setri; Engelmanninkuusi; Euroopankuusi; Laminoitu kuusi; Sitkankuusi; Massiivikuusi; Kuusi; Muu
cs: Materiál rezonanční desky akustického klavíru: Cedr; Smrk Engelmannův; Smrk ztepilý; Laminovaný smrk; Smrk sitka; Masivní smrk; Smrk; Ostatní
lt-LT: Akustinio pianino rezonansinės plokštės medžiaga: Kedras; Engelmano eglė; Europinė eglė; Laminuota eglė; Sitkinė eglė; Eglės masyvas; Eglė; Kita
es: Material de la caja de resonancia del piano acústico: Cedro; Abeto de Engelmann; Abeto europeo; Abeto laminado; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto macizo; Abeto; Otro
ja: アコースティックピアノの響板材: シダー; イングルマンスプルース; ヨーロピアンスプルース; ラミネートスプルース; シトカスプルース; 単板スプルース; スプルース; その他
zh-CN: 原声钢琴音板材质: 雪松木; 英格曼云杉木; 欧洲云杉木; 层压云杉木; 西加云杉木; 实心云杉木; 云杉木; 其他
bg-BG: Материал за резонаторна плоча на акустично пиано: Кедър; Енгелманов смърч; Европейски смърч; Ламиниран смърч; Ситкански смърч; Масивен смърч; Смърч; Други
ko: 어쿠스틱 피아노 향판 재질: 삼나무; 엥겔만 가문비나무; 유럽산 가문비나무; 합판 가문비나무; 시트카 가문비나무; 단판 가문비나무; 가문비나무; 기타
nl: Materiaal van de klankkast van een akoestische piano: Ceder; Engelmann-sparrenhout; Europees sparrenhout; Gelamineerd sparrenhout; Sitka-sparrenhout; Massief sparrenhout; Sparrenhout; Overig
pt-PT: Material da tábua harmónica do piano acústico: Cedro; Abeto de Engelmann; Abeto europeu; Abeto laminado; Abeto de Sitka; Abeto maciço; Abeto; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál rezonančnej dosky akustického klavíra: Céder; Smrek Engelmannov; Európsky smrek; Laminovaný smrek; Smrek sitkanský; Masívny smrek; Smrek; Iné
ru: Материал деки акустического фортепиано: Кедр; Ель Энгельмана; Европейская ель; Ламинированная ель; Ситхинская ель; Массив ели; Ель; Другое
sv: Akustiskt piano – material för resonansbotten: Ceder; Engelmannsgran; Europeisk gran; Laminerad gran; Sitkagran; Solid gran; Gran; Övrigt